New York, session 2025-2026, S4482.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 16-102 of the election law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 2-a to read as follows: 3 2-a. A subpoena issued in relation to this article shall require that 4 the subpoena be served with a separate informational sheet that summa- 5 rizes why the subpoena has been issued, that the case is not related to 6 a criminal action, that the person to whom the subpoena is being served 7 does not currently face criminal charges related to the case, specify 8 that the action is related to the upcoming election of the pertinent 9 office and the consequences of not following the subpoena. The informa- 10 tional sheet shall be affixed to the subpoena being served and shall be 11 written in plain language and printed in a format and type size that is 12 clear and easy to read. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 14 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01386-01-5